Arkansas, session 2025, SB645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings — Study.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Critical minerals are essential for various industries,
including without limitation energy, defense, and technology;
(2) Ensuring energy independence for the United States requires
a diversified approach, including without limitation supply chain
diversification and capital investment attractiveness in value-added
manufacturing;
(3) Lithium recovery projects are recognized as essential to the
continued growth and development of Arkansas's critical energy resources and
the prosperity of its citizens;
(4) Global demand for lithium is expected to quadruple by 2030,
necessitating proactive efforts to support domestic lithium production to
reduce reliance on foreign imports and bolster energy security;
(5) Encouraging lithium recovery will provide economic benefits
to Arkansas, attract investment, create jobs, and strengthen the state’s
industrial and manufacturing base;
*CRH339*
04/14/2025 2:33:21 PM CRH339

SB645
(6) Reducing statutory and regulatory roadblocks, including
those related to state and local taxes, permit fees, payments,
infrastructure, and workforce development, will create an optimal economic
ecosystem to support lithium recovery and related industries; and
(7) Arkansas's first-mover advantage is being threatened by an
increase of lithium exploration and development opportunities in Louisiana,
Texas, and other states where policymakers are enacting incentives and taking
steps to provide regulatory certainty.
(b)(1) The General Assembly shall conduct a study to evaluate the
state’s national and global competitiveness in attracting lithium recovery
projects and related value-added manufacturing and supply-chain activities.
(2) The study required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall:
(A) Assess the competitiveness of Arkansas using a matrix
consistent with factors utilized by companies engaged in lithium recovery and
related activities;
(B) Identify potential developmental impediments,
including without limitation state and local taxes, permit fees, payments,
regulatory burdens, and other government-induced or imposed activities;
(C) Evaluate infrastructure needs, including without
limitation rail, roads, water supply, and electricity transmission and
distribution necessary for lithium recovery and processing projects;
(D) Examine workforce availability and training programs
to ensure a skilled labor force to support the lithium industry; and
(E) Provide recommendations to enhance Arkansas’s
attractiveness for investment in lithium recovery and associated value-added
manufacturing.









04/14/2025 2:33:21 PM CRH339